Florida, session 2026, SB886.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.â(1)âThe Agency for Health Care Administration 13 shall conduct or contract for a detailed fiscal impact study to 14 determine the feasibility of implementing the following 15 provisions relating to discounted drug prices under the 340B 16 Drug Pricing Program: 17 (a)1.âRequiring drug manufacturers to sell a drug to 18 Medicaid pharmacies at no more than the 340B Drug Pricing 19 Program discounted price if the drug is: 20 a.âOn the Medicaid preferred drug list as described in s. 21 409.912(5), Florida Statutes. 22 b.âA covered drug under the 340B Drug Pricing Program. 23 2.âAuthorizing drug manufacturers to deliver drugs sold in 24 accordance with subparagraph 1. to the purchasing Medicaid 25 pharmacy by any method used by the drug manufacturer. 26 3.âIf a drug manufacturer sells a drug in accordance with 27 subparagraph 1. to a Medicaid pharmacy at the 340B Drug Pricing 28 Program discounted price and such discounted price is higher 29 than the state Medicaid negotiated price, requiring the drug 30 manufacturer to pay a rebate to the state equal to the 31 difference between the discounted price and the state Medicaid 32 negotiated price. 33 (b)âRequiring pharmacy benefits managers participating in 34 the Medicaid program to pay a Medicaid pharmacy the 340B Drug 35 Pricing Program discounted price plus the professional 36 dispensing fee as determined under rule 59G-4.251, Florida 37 Administrative Code, as amended, for any drug that is on the 38 Medicaid preferred drug list as described in s. 409.912(5), 39 Florida Statutes, and that is a covered drug under the 340B Drug 40 Pricing Program. 41 (c)1.âRequiring drug wholesalers and distributors to sell a 42 drug to a Medicaid pharmacy at the 340B Drug Pricing Program 43 discounted price if the drug is: 44 a.âOn the Medicaid preferred drug list as described in s. 45 409.912(5), Florida Statutes. 46 b.âA covered drug under the 340B Drug Pricing Program. 47 2.âProhibiting drug wholesalers and distributors from 48 changing an existing pricing model or program that is in place 49 with a Medicaid pharmacy by exempting a drug described in 50 paragraph (a) from the pricing model or program or by 51 referencing such drug in any way in the pricing model or 52 program. 53 (d)âRequiring Medicaid pharmacies to provide a covered drug 54 under the 340B Drug Pricing Program at the discounted price only 55 to Medicaid recipients. 56 (2)âThe agency shall submit the results of the study to the 57 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 58 House of Representatives by January 31, 2027. 59 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.